Hawaii statutes.
§356D-2 Hawaii public housing authority;
establishment, staff. (a) There is established the Hawaii public housing
authority to be placed within the department of human services for
administrative purposes only. The authority shall be a public body and a body
corporate and politic.

(b) The authority shall employ, exempt from
chapter 76 and section 26-35(a)(4), an executive director, an executive
assistant, a chief financial management advisor, a property management branch
chief, a chief planner, and a redevelopment officer, whose salaries shall be
set by the board established under section 356D-3; provided that no salary
shall exceed the governor's salary. The authority may employ, subject to
chapter 76, technical experts and officers, agents, and employees, permanent or
temporary, as required. The authority may also employ officers, agents, and
employees; prescribe their duties and qualifications; and fix their salaries,
not subject to chapter 76, when in the determination of the authority, the services
to be performed are unique and essential to the execution of the functions of
the authority; provided that if the authority hires an officer, agent, or
employee in a capacity not subject to chapter 76, the authority shall include
in an annual report to the legislature, to be submitted not later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session, the position descriptions
and reasons for hiring the personnel in a civil service exempt capacity. The
authority may call upon the attorney general for legal services as it may
require. The authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees
the powers and duties it deems proper. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2; am L 2013, c
152, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next